Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.020

Actual malice. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.

[ 2024 c 164 s 202.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.